Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.070

Injury due to unlawful practices—Damages.

A person injured in his or her business or property by reason of any violation of or conspiracy to violate RCW 15.83.030 or 15.83.040 may sue in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which such violation occurred without respect to the amount in controversy, and shall recover damages sustained, including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of bringing the suit. Any action to enforce any cause of action under this section shall be forever barred unless commenced not later than two years after the cause of action accrues.

[ 1989 c 355 s 8.]